Utah statutes.
31A-22-701.   Groups eligible for group or blanket insurance.
(1)  A group or blanket accident and health insurance policy may be issued to:
(a)  any group:
(i)  to which a group life insurance policy may be issued under Sections
31A-22-502 through 31A-22-507; and
(ii)  that is formed for a reason other than the purchase of insurance; or
(b) any group specifically authorized by the commissioner under Section
31A-22-509, upon a finding that:
(i)  authorization is not contrary to the public interest;
(ii)  the proposed group is actuarially sound;
(iii)  formation of the proposed group may result in economies of scale in
administrative, marketing, and brokerage costs;
(iv)  the health insurance policy, certificate, or other indicia of coverage
that will be offered to the proposed group is substantially equivalent to
policies that are otherwise available to similar groups; and
(v)  the proposed group is formed for a reason other than the purchase of
insurance.
(2)  A blanket policy may also be issued to:
(a)  any common carrier or any operator, owner, or lessee of a means of
transportation, as policyholder, covering persons who may become passengers as
defined by reference to their travel status;
(b)  an employer, as policyholder, covering any group of employees,
dependents, or guests, as defined by reference to specified hazards incident
to any activities of the policyholder;
(c)  an institution of learning, including a school district, school
jurisdictional units, or the head, principal, or governing board of any of
those units, as policyholder, covering students, teachers, or employees;
(d)  any religious, charitable, recreational, educational, or civic
organization, or branch of those organizations, as policyholder, covering any
group of members or participants as defined by reference to specified hazards
incident to the activities sponsored or supervised by the policyholder;
(e)  a sports team, camp, or sponsor of the team or camp, as policyholder,
covering members, campers, employees, officials, or supervisors;
(f)  any volunteer fire department, first aid, civil defense, or other similar
volunteer organization, as policyholder, covering any group of members or
participants as defined by reference to specified hazards incident to
activities sponsored, supervised, or participated in by the policyholder;
(g)  a newspaper or other publisher, as policyholder, covering its carriers;
(h)  an association, including a labor union, which has a constitution and
bylaws and which has been organized in good faith for purposes other than that
of obtaining insurance, as policyholder, covering any group of members or
participants as defined by reference to specified hazards incident to the
activities or operations sponsored or supervised by the policyholder;
(i)  a health insurance purchasing association, as defined in Section
31A-34-103, organized and controlled solely by participating employers; and
(j)  any other class of risks which, in the judgment of the commissioner, may
be properly eligible for blanket accident and health insurance.
(3)  The judgment of the commissioner may be exercised on the basis of:
(a)  individual risks;
(b)  class of risks; or
(c)  both Subsections (3)(a) and (b).
